Washington statutes.
RCW 11.90.440

Enforcement of guardianship or protective order from another state.

(1) Upon registration of a guardianship or protective order from another state, the guardian or conservator may exercise in this state all powers authorized in the order of appointment except as prohibited under the laws of this state, including maintaining actions and proceedings in this state and, if the guardian or conservator is not a resident of this state, subject to any conditions imposed upon nonresident parties.

(2) A court of this state may grant any relief available under this chapter and other law of this state to enforce a registered order.

[ 2009 c 81 s 20.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 81: See note following RCW 11.90.010.